Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Article 2. Commission Investigation and Hearing.

Administrative Code. —

For rules governing practice and procedure before the state commission for human rights, see 6 AAC 30.

Collateral references. —

15 Am. Jur. 2d, Civil Rights, §§ 12 — 26.

14A C.J.S., Civil Rights, § 461 et seq.

Assignability and survivability of cause of action created by civil rights statute. 88 ALR2d 1153.

Actionability under state statutes of discrimination because of complaining party’s association with persons of different race, color, or the like. 35 ALR3d 859.

Sec. 18.80.100.
Complaint; withdrawal.

A person who is aggrieved by a discriminatory practice prohibited by this chapter may sign and file with the commission a written, verified complaint stating the name and address of the person alleged to have engaged in the discriminatory practice, and the particulars of the discrimination. A complainant may withdraw the complaint at any time before the service of an accusation under AS

18.80.120

. A withdrawal must be signed by the complainant and be in writing. A withdrawal does not limit the discretion of the executive director provided in (b) of this section.

The executive director may file a complaint in the manner provided in (a) of this section when a discriminatory practice comes to the attention of the executive director.

History.

(§ 1 ch 15 SLA 1963; am § 2 ch 117 SLA 1965; am §§ 1, 2 ch 63 SLA 2006)

Administrative Code. —

For inquiries, see 6 AAC 30, art. 1.

For complaints, see 6 AAC 30, art. 2.

For investigation, determination, and conciliation, see 6 AAC 30, art. 3.

For hearing procedures, see 6 AAC 30, art. 4.

For reports and recordkeeping, see 6?AAC 30, art. 8.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 14, ch. 63, SLA 2006, provides that the 2006 amendment of (a) of this section and (b) of this section apply “to all complaints filed on or after September 13, 2006.”

Sec. 18.80.105.
Temporary restraining order.

At any time after a complaint is filed under AS

18.80.100

, alleging an unlawful discriminatory practice, the commission may file a petition in the superior court in the judicial district in which the subject of the complaint occurs, or in the judicial district in which a respondent resides or transacts business, seeking appropriate temporary relief against the respondent, pending final determination of proceedings under this chapter, including an order or decree restraining the respondent from doing or procuring any act tending to render ineffectual any order the commission may enter with respect to the complaint.
The court has the power to grant the temporary relief or restraining order it considers just and proper; however, no relief or order extending beyond 10 days may be granted except by consent of the respondent or after hearing upon notice to the respondent and a finding by the court that there is reasonable cause to believe that the respondent has engaged in discriminatory practices.

History.

(§ 2 ch 119 SLA 1969)

Sec. 18.80.110.
Investigation and conciliation.

The executive director or a member of the commission’s staff designated by the executive director shall informally investigate the matters set out in a filed complaint, promptly and impartially. If the investigator determines that there is substantial evidence of an unlawful discriminatory practice under this chapter, the investigator shall immediately try to eliminate or remedy the discriminatory practice through an agreement reached by conference, conciliation, and persuasion. If an agreement is reached, it must be reduced to writing and signed by the complainant, executive director, and respondent. The agreement is binding and enforceable under this chapter as an order of the commission. An agreement reached under this section may include the compromise of damages authorized under this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 15 SLA 1963; am § 3 ch 63 SLA 2006)

Administrative Code. —

For complaints, see 6 AAC 30, art. 2.

For investigation, determination, and conciliation, see 6 AAC 30, art. 3.

For reports and recordkeeping, see 6?AAC 30, art. 8.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 14, ch. 63, SLA 2006, provides that the 2006 amendment of this section applies “to all complaints filed on or after September 13, 2006.”

Sec. 18.80.112.
Dismissal of complaint without prejudice.

If an investigation of a complaint under AS

18.80.110

fails to discover substantial evidence of an unlawful discriminatory practice under this chapter, the executive director shall issue an order dismissing the complaint without prejudice.

At any time before the issuance of an accusation under AS

18.80.120

, the executive director may dismiss without prejudice a complaint if the executive director determines that

the complainant’s objection to a proposed agreement under AS

18.80.110

is unreasonable;

the complainant is unavailable or unwilling to participate in a hearing;

relief is precluded by the absence of the person alleged to have engaged in the discriminatory practice;

the person aggrieved by the discriminatory practice has initiated or has notified in writing the commission of the intent to initiate an action or proceeding in another forum based on the same facts;

a hearing will not represent the best use of commission resources;

a hearing will not advance the purposes stated in AS

18.80.200

; or

the probability of success of the complaint on the merits is low.

The commission, in its discretion, may, but is not required to, review the executive director’s order of dismissal under (a) or (b) of this section and may affirm the order, remand the complaint for further investigation, or, if the commission concludes that substantial evidence supports the complaint of an unlawful discriminatory practice, refer the complaint for conference, conciliation, and persuasion as provided in AS

18.80.110

, or for hearing.

Dismissal under this section does not prevent a complainant from

initiating an action or proceeding in another forum; or

filing a new complaint under AS

18.80.100

that resolves the grounds for the dismissal under this section.

History.

(§ 4 ch 63 SLA 2006)

Administrative Code. —

For investigation, determination, and conciliation, see 6 AAC 30, art. 3.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 14, ch. 63, SLA 2006 provides that this section applies “to all complaints filed on or after September 13, 2006.”

Sec. 18.80.115.
Confidential information.

Except as provided in AS

18.80.105

, the commission may not make public the name of a person initiating a complaint or a person alleged to have committed an act or practice declared unlawful in this chapter during an investigation conducted by the commission under AS

18.80.110

. The records of investigation and information obtained by the commission during an investigation under AS

18.80.110

are confidential and may not be made available by the commission for inspection by the public.
However, the records and information compiled by the commission during an investigation shall be available to the complainant or respondent (1) at least 10 days before a hearing is held under AS

18.80.120

or upon receipt by the complainant or respondent under AS

18.80.120

of a notice of failure of conciliation under AS 18.80.110, whichever occurs earlier; and (2) in accordance with the rules of discovery if an action relating to the charge is commenced in court.
In addition, the commission may issue public statements describing or warning of a course of conduct that constitutes or will constitute an unlawful practice under this chapter, and the commission may also make information public if necessary to perform its duties or exercise its powers under AS

18.80.105

and 18.80.120 —

18.80.145

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 125 SLA 1980)

Administrative Code. —

For investigation, determination, and conciliation, see 6 AAC 30, art. 3.

For hearing discovery, see 6 AAC 30, art. 5.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The Department of Natural Resources may release Affirmative Action Plan data to the Human Rights Commission for assistance in compliance review. As long as the department provides for adequate safeguards to assure the confidentiality of such data, there is no problem in sharing the information with the agency that has the expertise to interpret it. July 17, 1986 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 18.80.120.
Hearing.

If no agreement is reached under AS

18.80.110

and the executive director determines to refer the complaint for hearing, the executive director shall issue an accusation based on the investigator’s determination of substantial evidence and serve the person charged in the accusation and the complainant with notice of the referral and a copy of the accusation. The executive director’s decision to refer the complaint to hearing is not reviewable by the commission under this chapter. The location of the hearing is the commission office unless the commission designates another location. The executive director, or the executive director’s designee, shall present the case in support of the accusation before the commission. The person charged in the accusation may file a written answer and may appear at the hearing, with or without counsel, and submit evidence.

The commission shall request the chief administrative law judge to appoint, under AS

44.64.020

, an administrative law judge employed or retained by the office of administrative hearings to preside over a hearing conducted under this section. AS

44.64.040

—

44.64.055

,

44.64.070

—

44.64.200

, and the procedures in AS

44.62.330

—

44.62.630

(Administrative Procedure Act) apply to the hearing except as otherwise provided in this chapter.

An accusation may be reasonably and fairly amended by the commission. An amendment to name a different discriminatory practice must be supported by substantial evidence, and the discriminatory practice must be referred for conference, conciliation, and persuasion as provided in AS

18.80.110

, before a hearing may proceed.

In a hearing on an accusation, each element of an accusation or defense must be proven by a preponderance of the evidence.

At any time after the issuance of an accusation, the executive director or the person charged in the accusation may petition for a summary decision on the accusation. The commission shall grant a petition if, after a reasonable opportunity for discovery, the record shows that there is no genuine issue of material fact and the petitioner is entitled to an order under AS

18.80.130

as a matter of law.

History.

(§ 1 ch 15 SLA 1963; am § 3 ch 117 SLA 1965; am § 3 ch 42 SLA 1972; am § 2 ch 125 SLA 1980; am § 2 ch 52 SLA 1997; am § 36 ch 163 SLA 2004; am § 5 ch 63 SLA 2006)

Administrative Code. —

For investigation, determination, and conciliation, see 6 AAC 30, art. 3.

For hearing procedures, see 6 AAC 30, art. 4.

For hearing discovery, see 6 AAC 30, art. 5.

For reports and recordkeeping, see 6?AAC 30, art. 8.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 14, ch. 63, SLA 2006, provides that the 2006 repeal and reenactment of this section applies “to all complaints filed on or after September 13, 2006.”

Opinions of attorney general. —

The activity of presenting cases at an administrative hearing before the Human Rights Commission or one of its hearing officers by a non-attorney staff member of the commission does not constitute the unlawful practice of law. September 11, 1979 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 18.80.130.
Order; interest rate.

At the completion of the hearing or after consideration of a petition for summary decision under AS

18.80.120(e)

, if the commission finds that a person charged in an accusation has engaged in the discriminatory practice alleged in the accusation, it shall order the person to refrain from engaging in the discriminatory practice. The order must include findings of fact and may order the person to take affirmative action to correct the discriminatory practice. The commission may not order an award of noneconomic or punitive damages in a case. In a case involving a discriminatory practice in

employment, the commission may order any appropriate relief, including one or more of the following: training of an employer, labor organization, or employment agency, and its employees concerning discriminatory practices; an accommodation for a person with a disability; removal of or changes to a personnel record; posting of signs; back pay; the hiring, reinstatement, or upgrading of an employee with or without back pay; the payment of front pay for a period of not more than one year if hiring, reinstatement, or upgrading of an employee is inappropriate because a vacancy does not exist, the employer’s discriminatory practice rendered the employee incapable of returning to work, or the relationship between the employer and employee has so deteriorated as to make working conditions intolerable; restoration to membership in a labor organization; admission to or participation in an apprenticeship training program, on-the-job training program, or other retraining program; or restoration of seniority; however, an order for back pay or front pay must be reduced by the amount the employee could have earned or could earn by making reasonably diligent efforts to obtain similar employment;

housing, the commission may order the sale, lease, or rental of the housing accommodation to the aggrieved person if it is still available, or the sale, lease, or rental of a like accommodation owned by the person charged in the accusation if one is still available, or the sale, lease, or rental of the next vacancy in a like accommodation, owned by the person charged in the accusation; the commission may award actual damages, which shall include the expenses incurred by the complainant for obtaining alternative housing or space; for storage of goods and effects; and for moving and other costs actually incurred as a result of the unlawful practice or violation.

The order may require a report on the manner of compliance.

If the commission finds that a person charged in an accusation has not engaged in the discriminatory practice alleged in the accusation, it shall issue and cause to be served on the complainant an order dismissing the complaint.

A copy of the order shall be filed in all cases with the attorney general of this state.

The commission may order payment of reasonable expenses, including reasonable attorney fees to any private party before the commission when the commission, in its discretion, determines the allowance is appropriate.

The interest rate for an award under this section is determined in the manner provided in AS

09.30.070

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 15 SLA 1963; am § 4 ch 117 SLA 1965; am §§ 4 — 6 ch 104 SLA 1975; am §§ 6 — 8 ch 63 SLA 2006)

Administrative Code. —

For investigation, determination, and conciliation, see 6 AAC 30, art. 3.

For hearing procedures, see 6 AAC 30, art. 4.

For hearing discovery, see 6 AAC 30, art. 5.

For reports and recordkeeping, see 6?AAC 30, art. 8.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 14, ch. 63, SLA 2006, provides that the 2006 amendment of (a) and (c) of this section and (f) of this section apply “to all complaints filed on or after September 13, 2006.”

Sec. 18.80.135.
Judicial review and enforcement.

A complainant, or person against whom a complaint is filed or other person aggrieved by an order of the commission, may obtain judicial review of the order in accordance with AS

44.62.560

—

44.62.570

.

The commission may obtain a court order for the enforcement of any of its orders by filing a complaint with the superior court in the judicial district in which the unlawful practice is alleged to have occurred.

History.

(§ 5 ch 117 SLA 1965; am § 9 ch 63 SLA 2006)

Cross references. —

For original jurisdiction of superior court over cases arising under this chapter, see AS

22.10.020(i)

.

Administrative Code. —

For hearing procedures, see 6 AAC 30, art. 4.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 14, ch. 63, SLA 2006, provides that the 2006 amendment of (b) of this section applies “to all complaints filed on or after September 13, 2006.”

Sec. 18.80.140.
Effect of compliance with order.

Immediate and continuing compliance with all the terms of a commission order is a bar to criminal prosecution for the particular instances of discriminatory practice described in the accusation issued under AS

18.80.120

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 15 SLA 1963; am § 10 ch 63 SLA 2006)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 14, ch. 63, SLA 2006, provides that the 2006 amendment of this section applies “to all complaints filed on or after September 13, 2006.”

Sec. 18.80.145.
Intervention by State Commission for Human Rights.

When an action is brought under AS

22.10.020(i)

, the plaintiff shall serve a copy of the complaint on the commission. Upon timely application, the commission may intervene as a party to the action as a matter of right. If the commission certifies in writing to the court that it is presently investigating or actively dealing with the act, practice, or policy of the defendant giving rise to the cause of action, the court shall, at the request of the commission, defer proceedings for a period of not more than 45 days or such extended period as the court may allow; except that the court may enter an order or injunction if necessary to prevent irreparable injury to the plaintiff.

If, within the period allowed, a hearing is conducted and a decision is reached under AS

18.80.120

and

18.80.130

, the decision of the commission is binding on the parties to the court action as to all issues resolved in the hearing but not as to any issues not resolved in the hearing.

When proceedings in the superior court are deferred for a hearing and decision under this section, the plaintiff may proceed, after the decision of the commission, as an aggrieved party for the purpose of obtaining judicial review under AS

18.80.135

, whether or not the person was a party to, or complainant in, the administrative proceedings.

If the commission does not intervene or file a certificate and conduct a hearing as provided in this section, the court has complete jurisdiction of the case, notwithstanding the provisions of AS

18.80.280

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 240 SLA 1970; am §§ 37, 38 ch 163 SLA 2004)